Alaska, session 34, HB306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 04.21.020(a) is amended to read: 04 (a) Except as provided under (b) and (d) of this section, a person who provides 05 alcoholic beverages to another person may not be held civilly liable for injuries 06 resulting from the intoxication of that person unless the person who provides the 07 alcoholic beverages holds a license authorized under AS 04.09.020 - 04.09.370 or is 08 an agent or employee of a licensee and 09 (1) the alcoholic beverages are provided to a person under 21 years of 10 age in violation of AS 04.16.051, unless the licensee, agent, or employee secures in 11 good faith from the person a signed statement, liquor identification card, or driver's 12 license meeting the requirements of AS 04.21.050(a) and (b), that indicates that the 13 person is 21 years of age or older; or 14 (2) as established by clear and convincing evidence, the alcoholic 15 beverages are 01 (A) knowingly sold, given, or bartered to a drunken person 02 in violation of AS 04.16.030(a)(1); 03 (B) provided to a drunken person in violation of 04 AS 04.16.030(a)(2) - (4); or 05 (C) knowingly sold, given, or bartered to a person at an 06 establishment after the lawful hours of operation of the establishment 07 have concluded [AS 04.16.030]. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.